Louisiana, session 2026, SB487.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 4:715(A)(7) and 719(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§715. Personnel to hold games; commissions or salaries; equipment and supplies;
expenses
A. * * *
(7) No lease or other agreement providing for a rental arrangement for
premises or equipment shall provide for payment in excess of the reasonable market
rental rate as mutually agreed to in writing for such the premises or equipment and
in no case shall any payment be based on a percentage of gross receipts or profits
derived from a game of chance.
* * *
§719. Commercial lessor license
* * *
B. No lease or other agreement of any premises by a commercial lessor to
any charitable organization for any charitable gaming session shall provide for
payment in excess of the reasonable market rental rate as mutually agreed to in
writing for such the premises as provided in the local licensing ordinance. No lease
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 487 ENROLLED
or other agreement shall provide for rental for less than a two-hour session.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 4:727 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.